Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202638-605
Board, defined.

Board means the Board of Nursing.

Laws 1984, LB 761, § 6;

Laws 1993, LB 536, § 74;

Laws 1999, LB 828, § 161;

Laws 2005, LB 256, § 83;

R.S.Supp.,2006, § 71-1743;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 217;

Laws 2025, LB346, § 12;

Laws 2026, LB905, § 8.
July 1, 2026